District of Columbia statutes.
8-651.04

Preservation of Special Trees; permits; penalties.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person or nongovernmental entity, without a Special Tree removal permit issued by the Mayor, to top, cut down, remove, girdle, break, or destroy any Special Tree.

(b)

The Mayor shall issue a Special Tree removal permit under this section where the applicant has:

(1)

Shown that the Special Tree in question is a Hazardous Tree;

(2)

Shown that the Special Tree in question is of a species that has been identified, by regulation, as appropriate for removal; or

(3)

Paid into the Tree Fund an amount equal to $35 for each inch of the circumference of the Special Tree in question.

(4)

Repealed.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

A violation of subsection (a) of this section, or a failure to comply with the conditions contained in a Special Tree removal permit, shall constitute a violation subject to a fine of not less than $100 per each inch of the circumference of the Special Tree in question.

June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-309, § 104, 50 DCR 888
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 421, 61 DCR 8045
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-142 repealed (b)(4) and (c) and made related changes.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(h) of D.C. Law 20-142 provided that § 421 of the act shall apply as of December 17, 2014.